Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2651.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 28, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 33, to read: CHAPTER 33 BLUE ENVELOPE PROGRAM ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE28-9801. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Blue envelope" means an envelope that is marked with instructions and information for both the driver and the law enforcement officer, pursuant to this chapter. 2. "Blue envelope program" means the voluntary program established by this chapter that is designed to facilitate effective communication between certified peace officers and persons with autism spectrum disorder during traffic stops or other law enforcement interactions. 3. "Law enforcement agency" means the department of public safety, a municipal police department, a county sheriff's office, a tribal law enforcement agency or a federal law enforcement agency that operates within this state. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE28-9802. Blue envelope program; requirements; confidentiality A. The blue envelope program is established in the department as a voluntary participation program that facilitates effective communication between law enforcement agencies and persons with a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder. B. The department shall provide a standardized, clearly marked blue envelope available in either English and Spanish to a driver who has a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder and who requests the blue envelope. C. the department, the university of Arizona and community stakeholders shall COLLABORATE to determine the design and contents of the blue envelope, which shall be informed by evidence-based practices and communication strategies that support effective interactions between law enforcement agencies and persons with autism spectrum disorder. D. The contents of the envelope may include: 1. The person's vehicle registration. 2. The person's vehicle insurance information. 3. Any information about how to communicate with a driver who is diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder for law enforcement, which shall be in English. E. The department and law enforcement agencies may not disclose the identity of any person who is participating in the blue envelope program pursuant to this chapter. END_STATUTE